Arkansas, session 2025, SB544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503, concerning definitions used
under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Opt-out contract" means an agreement or a contract in
which a pharmacy must proactively notify the pharmacy benefits manager if the
pharmacy wishes to opt-out of certain terms potentially leading to lower
reimbursement rates or network exclusions if the pharmacy does not opt-out of
the contract.
(B) "Opt-out contract" includes a term that requires a
pharmacy to take affirmative action to opt-out of certain terms or conditions
of the contract;
(17)(A) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies" means a standardized agreement entered into by a pharmacy
benefits manager and a network of pharmacies across the United States in
which a pharmacy is, either directly or indirectly, passed through a pharmacy
services administrative organization messenger model to agree to certain
pricing terms and conditions for a patient if that pharmacy is managed or
represented by a pharmacy benefits manager network.
*ANS419*
03/20/2025 3:05:26 PM ANS419

SB544
(B) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies" includes a nationwide network of pharmacies that have entered
into a contract for national reimbursement rates, terms, and conditions that
are not Arkansas-specific with a pharmacy benefits manager to provide
pharmacist services, including without limitation dispensing medications to a
patient within the pharmacy benefits manager network;
(18)(A) "Place on probation" means an enforcement action against
a pharmacy benefits manager for lack of compliance with the requirements of
the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, § 23-92-501 et seq.
(B) "Place on probation" includes penalties of probation
and may include:
(i) Prohibiting on advertising or bidding on new
business or requests for proposals;
(ii) Requiring notification of probation to a
current contracted plan or program that is directly or indirectly funded by a
state appropriation to furnish, cover the cost of, or otherwise provide for
pharmacist services to an individual who resides in or is employed in this
state; or
(iii) Other penalties established by rule of the
Insurance Commissioner;
(19) "Underpayment violation" means:
(A) A violation of § 23-92-506(b);
(B) A violation of § 17-92-507; or
(C) A fair and reasonable compensation payment violation
as defined under § 23-92-506(a) and by rule of the commissioner; and
(20) "Unique combination for pharmacy claims" means a pharmacy
claims bank identification number, pharmacy claims group number, pharmacy
claims processor control number, or any combination of a pharmacy claims bank
identification number, pharmacy claims group number, and pharmacy claims
processor control number that is used by a pharmacy benefits manager to
process a pharmacy claim.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-92-506, concerning prohibited practices
of a pharmacy benefits manager, is amended to add additional subsections to
read as follows:
(f) Upon request, a pharmacy benefits manager, including pharmacy
03/20/2025 3:05:26 PM ANS419

SB544
benefits managers contracting for Medicare pharmacy and pharmacist benefits,
shall provide a pharmacy services administrative organization, pharmacy, or
pharmacist with each pharmacy claims bank identification number, pharmacy
claims group number, pharmacy claims processor control number, and each
unique combination for pharmacy claims for each pharmacy network established
or administered by a pharmacy benefits manager to enable the pharmacy
services administrative organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist to make an
informed healthcare contracting decision to support negotiating a new
contract or to exit or renew an existing contract.
(g) For a new contract, an opt-out contract, a contract amendment, or
a renewal of an existing network, a pharmacy benefits manager, including
pharmacy benefits managers contracting for Medicare pharmacy and pharmacist
benefits, shall clearly list for the pharmacy services administrative
organization, a pharmacy, or pharmacist each pharmacy claims bank
identification number, pharmacy claims group number, pharmacy claims
processor control number, and each unique combination for pharmacy claims for
each pharmacy network established or administered by a pharmacy benefits
manager to enable the pharmacy services administrative organization,
pharmacy, or pharmacist to make an informed healthcare contracting decision.
(h)(1) An opt-out contract shall include at least sixty-days notice to
the pharmacy services administrative organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist.
(2) The notice required under subdivision (h)(1) of this section
shall be sent by both email and fax.
(3) The opt-out option in an opt-out contract shall offer the
pharmacy services administrative organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist the
ability to notify the pharmacy benefits manager of the decision to opt-out or
remain in the network.
(4) If a pharmacy benefits manager has not received a reply from
the pharmacy services administrative organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist
within thirty (30) days of the first notice that the opt-out notice was
received, the pharmacy benefits manager shall send a notice to the pharmacy
services administrative organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist a notification
by certified mail of the opt-out contract.
(i)(1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not offer "take it or leave
it" terms and conditions in a contract that would violate requirements of
state law.
03/20/2025 3:05:26 PM ANS419

SB544
(2) A pharmacy benefits manager shall actively respond,
communicate, and adjust to the concerns of a pharmacy services administrative
organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist that proposed or existing contract and
provider manual terms do not follow state law.
(j) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not utilize a pharmacy benefits
manager national contract to pharmacies that does not include a separate
Arkansas-based amendment or Arkansas-specific contract that clearly complies
with this subchapter and other state laws.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-92-508(c), concerning the penalties
under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commissioner may:
(1) Impose a penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per
violation against a pharmacy benefits manager if the commissioner finds that
the pharmacy benefits manager has not:
(A) Followed the process established for determining
pricing or costs under the Maximum Allowable Cost List under § 17-92-507; or
(B) Used the national average drug acquisition cost under
§ 23-92-506(b); or
(C) Complied with the requirements of this subchapter;
(2) Revoke, place on probation, or suspend the license of a
pharmacy benefits manager or revoke, place on probation, or suspend the use
of a specific network used by a pharmacy benefits manager and identified by a
registered unique combination for pharmacy claims if the commissioner finds
that the pharmacy benefits manager:
(A) Has committed a pattern of violations of this
subchapter;
(B) Has not followed the process established for
determining pricing and costs under the Maximum Allowable Cost List under §
17-92-507; or
(C) Has not used the national average drug acquisition
cost under § 23-92-506(b); or
(D) Has violated this subchapter; and
(3) For a pattern of more than two (2) violations of this
subchapter, revoke, or prohibit a pharmacy benefits manager for up to three
03/20/2025 3:05:26 PM ANS419

SB544
(3) years from bidding on new business opportunities with a plan or program
that is directly or indirectly funded by a state appropriation to furnish,
cover the cost of, or otherwise provide for pharmacist services to an
individual who resides in or is employed in this state.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-92-508, concerning enforcement of the
Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) The commissioner shall require a pharmacy benefits manager that
has an underpayment violation to:
(A) Pay twelve percent (12%) interest per month as a
penalty to the impacted pharmacy or pharmacist for pharmacist services on an
underpayment violation that is calculated on the number of days after the
claim was adjudicated until resolution of the underpayment violation; and
(B) Pay the entire amount of the amount of the
underpayment violation plus the required interest under subdivision (d)(1) of
this section to the impacted pharmacy or pharmacist for pharmacist services
on an underpayment violation.
(2) A pharmacy or pharmacist shall not be required to collect an
amount of an underpayment violation or interest from a patient in the form of
copay or out-of-pocket expense to the patient.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-92-509(b)(1), concerning the rules for
the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) Rules adopted under this subchapter shall set penalties or
fines, including without limitation monetary fines, probation, suspension of
licensure or unique combination for pharmacy claims, and revocation of
licensure or unique combination for pharmacy claims for violations of this
subchapter and rules adopted under this subchapter.






03/20/2025 3:05:26 PM ANS419